Colorado statutes. TITLE 41 Aeronautics: Aircraft and Airports
ARTICLE 3
PUBLIC AIRPORT AUTHORITY LAW

Law reviews:

For article, "

C

reation and Regulation of Airport Authorities in

C

olorado", see 34 Colo. Law. 49 (Feb. 2005).

Section

41-3-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Public Airport Authority Act".

Source:

L. 65:

p. 164, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-5-1.

41-3-102. Legislative declaration.

The purpose of this article is to authorize the creation by cities and towns, and counties, and the state of Colorado, through their joint action, and by counties acting by independent action or jointly with the state, of airport authorities, corporate and politic, and constituting political subdivisions of the state of Colorado, for the purpose of acquiring and improving airports, air navigation facilities, and related facilities, and the financing of the cost of such acquisition by the issuance of bonds or other obligations of such authorities payable from the income of any such authorities and otherwise secured to the extent permitted by law without the incurrence of an indebtedness by the state of Colorado, or by any of its political subdivisions, thereby promoting and facilitating transportation by air from or to points located within the state of Colorado, all to the benefit and general welfare of the state of Colorado, its political subdivisions, and the inhabitants thereof.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 164, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-5-2.

L. 69:

pp. 100, 105, §§ 1, 1.

41-3-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Air navigation facility" means any facility, other than one owned and operated by the United States, used in, available for use in, or designed for use in aid of air navigation, including any structures, mechanisms, lights, beacons, markers, communicating systems, or other instrumentalities or devices used or useful as an aid, or constituting an advantage or convenience to the safe taking off, navigation, and landing of aircraft, or the safe and efficient operation or maintenance of an airport, and any combination of any or all of such facilities.

"Airport" means any area of land or water which is used, or intended for use, for the landing and takeoff of aircraft, and any appurtenant areas which are used, or intended for use, for airport buildings or other airport facilities or rights-of-way, together with all airport buildings and facilities located thereon however financed. Such facilities may also include land and buildings, together with all appurtenances necessary or convenient thereto for the accommodation or convenience of the public, whether or not the members of the public so accommodated are directly or indirectly engaged in transportation by air, including, but not limited to, parking, dining, recreational, and hotel facilities.

"Airport hazard" means any structure, object of natural growth, or use of land which obstructs the airspace required for the flight of aircraft in landing or taking off at an airport, or is otherwise hazardous to such landing or taking off of aircraft.

"Authority" means a body corporate and politic and constituting a political subdivision of the state created for airport purposes under the provisions of this article.

"Board", as distinguished from the governing board defined in subsection (11) of this section, means the board of commissioners of any airport authority created pursuant to the provisions of this article.

"Bonds" means any bonds, notes, interim certificates, debentures, or similar obligations issued by an authority pursuant to this article.

"Clerk" means the custodian of the official records of a municipality or county.

"Combination" means any combination comprised of two or more municipalities, two or more counties, or any combination of one or more municipalities and one or more counties.

"County" means any county organized under the laws of the state of Colorado or an adjoining state and includes public entities which are both cities and counties.

"Federal government" means the United States, or any of its officers, agencies, boards, or commissions.

"Governing board" means the officials authorized by law to exercise by ordinance or resolution the lawmaking powers of a municipality or county.

"Income of the authority" means all revenues derived directly or indirectly by the authority from the use and operation of the airport, including, but not limited to, interest on investments and all rentals, fees, rates, or other charges for the use of the airport, or for any services rendered by the authority in the operation thereof, but excluding, if necessary or appropriate, money received as grants or gifts from the federal government or the state or other sources, the use of which is limited by the grantor or donor to the construction of capital improvements to an airport.

"Municipality" means any city or town, whether incorporated under the general laws of the state of Colorado or an adjoining state, article XX of the state constitution, or acts of the council and house of representatives of the territory of Colorado, but does not include local entities which are both cities and counties.

"Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, joint-stock association, or body politic; and the term includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or other similar representative thereof.

"Resolution" means a resolution of the board of county commissioners of a county or ordinance of a city, city and county, or town, whichever form of action is necessary or appropriate under the laws of the state of Colorado or an adjoining state, or under the charter of a city, or city and county, incorporated pursuant to article XX of the state constitution.

"State" means the state of Colorado or any of its agencies.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 164, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-5-3.

L. 69:

pp. 100, 105, §§ 2, 2.

L. 2016:

(9), (13), and (15) amended, (SB 16-168), ch. 164, p. 522, § 1, effective August 10.

41-3-104. Creation of authorities.

Any combination, or any county in this state acting independently, may create an authority that is authorized to operate an airport in this state and exercise the functions conferred by the provisions of this article, upon the issuance by the director of the division of local government in the department of local affairs of a certificate reciting that the authority has been duly organized according to the laws of the state of Colorado. Such certificate shall be issued by the director of said division upon the filing with him or her of a certified copy of the resolution of the county acting independently and, in the case of a combination, of each county or municipality joining therein, duly certified as correct by the clerk of the municipality or county. In the case of a combination, there shall also be filed with the director of said division a joint certificate of the clerks of any county or municipality joining therein, certifying that such counties or municipalities, and listing them, constitute all of the counties or municipalities joining in the formation of the authority. At the time of filing such resolutions, there shall also be filed a designation of the official name of the authority.

Any combination creating an authority may be increased from time to time to include one or more additional counties or municipalities, if each additional municipality or county and the members then included in the authority and the board of commissioners of the authority, respectively, adopt a resolution consenting thereto. Any authority which was created by a county acting independently may be increased from time to time to include one or more additional counties or municipalities, if each additional municipality or county and the county creating the authority and the board of commissioners of the authority, respectively, adopt a resolution consenting thereto. Upon the inclusion of any county or municipality in an authority initially created by a county acting independently, such authority shall be deemed to have been created by a combination for purposes of this article. Upon the inclusion of any county or municipality in the authority so created, either initially or as an additional member later, all rights, contracts, obligations, and property, both real and personal, of such municipality or county used for or in relation to transportation by air shall vest in the authority created pursuant to this section, unless otherwise specifically provided by the resolution including such municipality or county in the authority.

Any combination formed to create an authority may be decreased if each of the members then included therein and the board of the authority consent to the decrease and make provision for the retention or disposition of the assets and liabilities of the county or municipality, as the case may be; but, if the authority has any bonds outstanding, no such decrease shall be effective until at least seventy-five percent of the holders of the outstanding bonds of the authority consent thereto in writing, or unless the board determines that such decrease will not affect adversely the rights of the holders of such outstanding bonds.

A municipality or a county in this state shall not adopt a resolution authorized by this section without a public hearing thereon. Notice shall be given at least ten days prior to the date of the hearing in a newspaper having a general circulation in the municipality or county, as the case may be.

All commissioners of an authority shall be appointed for a term of four years each; except that a vacancy occurring other than by the expiration of term shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointments.

Any authority created pursuant to the provisions of this article shall cease to exist upon the filing with the director of the division of local government of a certified resolution of each county or municipality composing the authority requesting the termination of such authority; but adequate provisions shall be made for the payment of the outstanding bonds of the authority.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article to the contrary, the general assembly may, by law, authorize the governor, on behalf of the state, to join in the creation of any airport authority authorized by this article or to join any existing airport authority created pursuant to this article.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 166, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-5-4.

L. 69:

pp. 101, 105, §§ 3, 3.

L. 76:

(1) and (6) amended, p. 607, § 34, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(2) amended, p. 1310, § 1, effective March 10.

L. 2016:

(1) and (4) amended, (SB 16-168), ch. 164, p. 522, § 2, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For publication of legal notices, see article 70 of title 24.

41-3-105. Board of commissioners.

All powers, privileges, and duties vested in or imposed upon any authority organized pursuant to the provisions of this article shall be exercised and performed by and through the board except as otherwise provided by law; but the exercise of any and all executive, administrative, and ministerial powers may be by said board delegated and redelegated to any of the officers created or by the board acting under this article.

The board of commissioners of an authority created by the formation of a combination shall consist of at least five members, but no more than nine members, representing the counties or municipalities participating in the combination. The authorizing resolution, filed with the director of the division of local government in the department of local affairs, as provided in section 41-3-104 (1), shall contain a provision as to the representation of the counties and municipalities participating in the combination. The members of the board of an authority created by a combination shall be appointed by resolution of the governing boards of the counties or municipalities that are members of the combination, the initial appointments, at the election of such municipality or county, to be made by the authorizing resolution filed with the director of said division. If the county in which the airport is to be located is not a member of the combination, then the member or members, if any, to which such county is entitled shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners of such county. The board created by the independent action of a county shall consist of five members who shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners of the county, and initial appointments to such board, at the election of the board of county commissioners, may be made in the authorizing resolution filed with the director of said division. Board members from municipalities and counties in this state shall be taxpaying electors, as defined in section 1-1-104 (49), C.R.S., at the time of their appointment, residing in the municipality or county from which appointed. After an authority is organized by the formation of a combination, the inclusion of additional counties or municipalities shall entitle the included municipalities or counties to representation on the same basis as other counties or municipalities. Each member of the board may receive as compensation for his or her services a sum not in excess of sixty dollars per year. No member of the board shall receive any compensation as an employee of the authority or otherwise, other than that provided in this section, and no member of the board shall be interested in any contract or transaction with the authority except in his or her official respective capacity.

The term of each member shall be for four years; except that the terms of the members of the first board shall be adjusted so that the terms of one-half of the members shall expire two years thereafter. At the first meeting of the board of a newly formed authority the commissioners shall determine by lot which members shall serve for two-year terms and which shall serve for four-year terms. At the expiration of the term of any commissioner, a new appointment shall be made by the appropriate governing board, and any member may be appointed to succeed himself.

A change of residence of a member of the board from a municipality or county in the state to a place outside the municipality that he or she represents, or the county from which he or she is appointed, automatically creates a vacancy on the board as to such municipality or county. Vacancies which may occur on the board through death or resignation of one of the members, or for any other reason, shall be filled in the same manner as provided for the appointment of original members of the board.

The board, in addition to any other powers conferred by this article, has the following powers:

To fix the time and place at which its regular meetings shall be held, which place may be located within any municipality or county forming a part of an authority created by a combination, or within the county independently creating such authority, and shall provide for the calling and holding of special meetings; to organize, adopt bylaws and rules of procedure, and select a chairman and pro tem chairman. Notice of time and place designated for all regular meetings shall be posted in at least three places within each municipality and county forming a part of the authority if created by the formation of a combination, and, in addition, one such notice shall be posted, irrespective of the procedure under which the authority is created, in the county courthouse in the county wherein the airport is located and in the county creating the authority. Such notices shall remain posted and shall be changed in the event that the time or place of such regular meeting is changed. Special meetings may be called by any officer or member of the board by informing the other members of the date, time, and place of such meeting and the purpose for which it is called, and by posting as provided in this paragraph (a) at least three days previous to said meeting. All business of the board shall be conducted only during such regular or special meetings, and all of such meetings shall be open to the public.

To make and pass resolutions and orders not repugnant to the constitution of the United States; the state; an adjoining state, if a combination includes a municipality or county from the adjoining state; or other provisions of this article, necessary for the government and management of the affairs of the authority, and the execution of the powers vested in the authority and for carrying into effect the provisions of this article. On all resolutions the rolls shall be called and the ayes and nays recorded. Resolutions and orders may be adopted by viva voce vote, but on demand of any member the roll shall be called.

To record all resolutions, as soon as may be after their passage, in a book kept for that purpose and authenticate them by the signature of the presiding officer of the board and the clerk thereof. Any resolution may at the election of the board be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county wherein the airport is located within ten days of the date of passage and adoption, and shall become effective, if so provided, upon the date of such publication.

To transact business only if a quorum of sixty percent of the board is present at a regular or special meeting; but all questions involving the inclusion or exclusion of a municipality or county in or from the authority or authorizing any expenditures in excess of ten thousand dollars shall require the affirmative majority vote of the board, and all other questions shall require the affirmative vote of not less than fifty percent of the board;

To fix the location of the principal place of business of the authority and the location of all offices and departments maintained thereunder, the location thereof to be at such place as the board deems best;

To prescribe by resolution a system of business administration; to create any and all necessary offices; to establish and reestablish the powers and duties and compensation of all officers and employees; and to require and fix the amount of all official bonds necessary for the protection of the funds and property of the authority;

To employ clerical, legal, consulting, and engineering assistance and labor, and to delegate and redelegate to such employees the powers conferred by this article, under such conditions and restrictions as shall be fixed by the board to authorize such employees to bind the authority by contract;

To prescribe a method of auditing and allowing or rejecting claims and demands and a method for the letting of contracts on a fair and competitive basis for the construction of works, structures, or equipment or the performance or furnishing of labor, materials, or supplies as required for the carrying out of any of the purposes of this article; but, in cases where the amount involved is fifty thousand dollars or more, the board shall provide for the letting of contracts to the lowest responsible bidder after publication in the official newspaper of notices inviting bids, subject to the right of said board to reject any and all proposals and to readvertise for bids as provided in this section. The procedures above described shall be subject to the approval of the board of county commissioners of any county independently creating an authority under the provisions of this article, and any action on the part of the board to raise or increase revenue from any source whatsoever for the purposes of the authority shall also be subject to such approval. The board shall be bound to carry out any action requested by the board of county commissioners.

To constitute and appoint an official newspaper in this state to be used for the official publications of the authority; but nothing in this section shall prevent the board from directing publication in additional newspapers or other periodicals which public necessity may so require or indicate.

Where the state, pursuant to section 41-3-104 (7), joins in the creation of an airport authority authorized by this article or joins an existing airport authority created pursuant to this article, the state shall be entitled to such number of members of the board of commissioners as may be agreed upon by the creating parties or present parties of the authority and the state, as the case may be, but in no case shall the state be entitled to less than one member of the board of commissioners. The state member or members of the board of commissioners shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 168, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-5-5.

L. 69:

pp. 102, 106, §§ 4, 5, 4.

L. 73:

p. 192, § 1.

L. 76:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 608, § 35, effective July 1.

L. 80:

(2) amended, p. 417, § 37, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 1794, § 94, effective June 6.

L. 2004:

(5)(h) amended, p. 54, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2016:

(2), (4), (5)(b), and (5)(i) amended, (SB 16-168), ch. 164, p. 523, § 3, effective August 10.

41-3-106. Powers of an authority.

An authority has the following powers:

To have perpetual existence;

To have and use a corporate seal;

To sue and be sued, and be a party to suits, actions, and proceedings;

To enter into contracts and agreements affecting the affairs of the authority, including, but not limited to, contracts with the United States, the state of Colorado, and an adjoining state, if a combination includes a municipality or county from the adjoining state;

To borrow money and to issue bonds payable in whole or in part from the income of the authority and otherwise secured to the extent permitted by law; but, before any money shall be borrowed or any bonds issued, such borrowing or sale shall first be approved by the board of county commissioners of any county independently creating an authority under the provisions of this article. Said bonds shall be authorized by resolution of said board without the necessity of submitting the question of their issuance to the qualified electors of the municipalities or counties constituting members of the authority. Said resolution shall prescribe the form of said bonds, the manner of their execution, which may be effected by the use of the facsimile signatures of the officers of the authority in accordance with the laws of the state in effect at the time of their execution, shall provide for the terms thereof, including the maximum net effective interest rate for the issue of bonds, and the security for their payment, may authorize the issuance of additional bonds having a lien on a parity with or junior thereto on the income of the authority, provide for the redemption of said bonds prior to their respective maturities with or without premium, and direct that said bonds shall be sold at public or private sale at or below par, but such bonds shall not be sold at a price such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds exceeds the maximum net effective interest rate authorized. The board shall prescribe other details in connection with the issue of bonds. The bonds so authorized shall mature serially over a period not exceeding thirty years and shall bear interest at a net effective interest rate not exceeding the maximum net effective interest rate authorized. Said resolution and bonds may also include such other terms or recitals which in the judgment of the board are necessary or proper to render the same marketable. Nothing in this article shall be construed as authorizing the authority or any county to assess and levy taxes for the payment of said bonds, nor shall said bonds be construed to be an indebtedness of the municipalities or counties constituting members of the authority or of the county independently creating such authority within the meaning of any constitutional, charter, or statutory limitation.

To purchase, trade, exchange, acquire, buy, sell, and otherwise dispose of and encumber real and personal property of the authority and any interest therein, including leases and easements;

To refund any bonds of the authority as the same become due at stated maturities, or as a result of the exercise of the privilege of calling bonds for prior redemption, and to refund any such bonds in advance of such maturities or redemption dates in accordance with the laws of the state then in effect and applicable to municipalities. The terms and conditions of refunding bonds shall be substantially the same as those of an original issue of bonds.

To regulate, when acting singly, or by agreement, when acting jointly with any other municipality or county, the receiving, deposit, and removal and the embarkation of passengers or property to or from the airport; to regulate or prohibit any airport hazard; to exact and require charges, fees, and rentals, together with a lien to enforce the payment; to lease or assign for operation such space or area, appurtenances, appliances, or other conveniences necessary or useful in connection therewith; to own and operate aircraft; to employ pilots; to provide rules and regulations governing the use of such airport and facilities and the use of other property and means of transportation within or over said airport, landing field, and navigation facilities; to perform any duties, necessary or consistent with the regulation of air traffic; to enter into contracts or otherwise cooperate with the United States, the state, an adjoining state, if a combination includes a municipality or county from the adjoining state, or other public or private agencies; and to exercise such powers as may be required or consistent with the promotion of aeronautics and the furtherance of commerce and navigation by air;

To pledge all or a part of the income of the authority to the payment of the bonds authorized to be issued pursuant to the terms of this article and to otherwise secure the payment of said bonds to the extent permitted by law including, but not limited to, a conveyance in trust of any or all of the properties or facilities of the authority as a part of such security;

To have and exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by law for the condemnation of private property for public use and to take any property necessary to exercise the powers in this article granted, either within or without the boundaries of the municipalities or counties constituting members of the authority. In exercising the power of eminent domain, the procedure established and prescribed by articles 1 to 7 of title 38, C.R.S., shall be followed. Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit the power of a county otherwise to acquire property through the exercise of the power of eminent domain under and in accordance with the laws of the state.

To construct and maintain works and establish and maintain facilities, within or without the boundaries of the municipalities or counties constituting members of the authority or within or without the boundaries of the county independently creating an authority pursuant to the provisions of this article, across or along any public street or highway or in, upon, under, or over any vacant public lands, which public lands are now, or may become, the property of the state; but the authority shall promptly restore any such street or highway to its former state of usefulness as nearly as may be and shall not use the same in such manner as to completely or unnecessarily impair the usefulness thereof;

To invest any surplus money in the treasury of the authority, including such money in any sinking or trust fund established for the purpose of retiring bonds at or prior to maturity not required for the immediate necessities of the authority, in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. Such investment may be made by direct purchase of any issue of such securities, or part thereof, at the original sale of the same or by the subsequent purchase of such securities. Any securities thus purchased and held may be sold, unless such sale is prohibited by any agreement under which the same have been or shall be deposited and the proceeds thereof reinvested in securities as provided in this paragraph (l). Sales of any securities thus purchased and held shall be made at such time so that the proceeds may be applied to the purposes for which the money with which the securities were originally purchased was placed in the treasury of the authority.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 171, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-5-6.

L. 69:

p. 103, § 6.

L. 70:

p. 108, § 1.

L. 89:

(1)(l) amended, p. 1127, § 57, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(1)(d) and (1)(h) amended, (SB 16-168), ch. 164, p. 524, § 4, effective August 10.

41-3-107. Legal status of authorities - tax exemption.

An authority created pursuant to this article is hereby declared to be a political subdivision of the state, exercising essential governmental powers for a public purpose. The general assembly, therefore, finds:

That no authority, or county independently creating an authority, shall be required to pay any general ad valorem taxes upon an airport or any facilities connected therewith located within the state nor upon the interest of the authority therein;

That bonds issued under this article and the income therefrom shall be free and exempt from taxation by the state, or any political subdivision of the state, with the exception of transfer, inheritance, and estate taxes.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 174, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-5-7.

Cross references:

For the taxation of bonds issued by counties pursuant to article 5 of this title, see § 41-5-105.

41-3-108. Legal investments and securities.

It shall be legal for any bank, trust company, banker, savings bank, or banking institution, any building and loan association, savings and loan association, investment company, and other person carrying on a banking or investment business, any insurance company, insurance association, or other person carrying on an insurance business, and any executor, administrator, trustee, or fiduciary to invest funds or moneys in their custody in any of the bonds authorized to be issued pursuant to the provisions of this article. Public entities, as defined in section 24-75-601 (1), C.R.S., may invest public funds in such bonds only if said bonds satisfy the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. Such bonds shall be authorized security for public deposit. Nothing in this section shall be construed as relieving any public body or other person of any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 174, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-5-8.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1132, § 76, effective July 1.